Wyoming, session 2026, SF0016.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:
Section 1. W.S. 36-5-105(d)(iii), by creating new
subparagraphs (D) and (E) and by creating a new subsection
(k) is amended to read:
36-5-105. Criteria for leasing; preferences;
assignments, subleases or contracts; lands taken for war
purposes; mineral lands excepted; agricultural lands.
(d) If the lessee of state lands shall assign,
sublease or contract all or any part of the lease area, the
lease shall be subject to cancellation unless the director
approves the assignment, sublease or contract subject to
criteria established by the board of land commissioners
provided that:
(iii) In no event shall the lands be subleased
unless one-half (1/2) of the excess rental is paid to the
state. For purposes of this paragraph, "excess rental"
means the amount of money received from the sublease by the
lessee is in excess of the current annual grazing and
agricultural lease rental. "Excess rental" shall be
calculated by identifying the total money received for only
the use of leased or subleased state lands and subtracting
the annual lease rental;
(iv) A lessee of state lands whose lease
authorizes grazing on the state lands shall not be required
1

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0016
ENROLLED ACT NO. 11, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
to obtain the approval of the director to allow livestock
the lessee does not own to graze on the state lands
provided that:
(D) Notice of the presence of livestock not
owned by the lessee shall be given to the board on a form
provided by the office of state lands and investments not
more than thirty (30) days after the arrival of the
livestock on the leased land;
(E) In addition to the annual rental
amount, the lessee shall pay a monthly fee per head of non-
owned livestock which shall be established by the board and
shall not exceed fifty percent (50%) of the annual animal
unit month rental rate. The payment shall be made to the
board not later than thirty (30) days after the removal of
the non-owned livestock. For purposes of this subparagraph,
"animal unit month" means as defined by W.S.
41-3-116(a)(ii).
(k) If at any time a state grazing lessee notifies
the office that the common ownership of the entities
holding the state grazing lease and owning the livestock
grazing on the state grazing lease is not less than eighty
percent (80%), a sublease or a non-owned livestock fee
shall not be required.
Section 2. W.S. 36-5-105(d)(iv)(A) through (C), (v)
and (vi) is repealed.
2

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0016
ENROLLED ACT NO. 11, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
Section 3. This act is effective July 1, 2026.
(END)
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
Governor
TIME APPROVED: _________
DATE APPROVED: _________
I hereby certify that this act originated in the Senate.
Chief Clerk
3